pt-PT: Efeito do acabamento com tinta de álcool: Mudança de cor; Fluorescente; Glitter; Efeito brilhante; Iridescente; Efeito mate; Metálico; Néon; Opaco; Pastel; Perolado; Cintilante; Translúcido; Transparente; Outro
pl: Efekt wykończenia tuszem alkoholowym: Zmieniający kolor; Fluorescencyjny; Brokatowy; Błyszczący; Opalizujący; Matowy; Metaliczny; Neonowy; Kryjący; Pastelowy; Perłowy; Połyskujący; Półprzezroczysty; Przezroczysty; Inny
sl-SI: Učinek končne obdelave z alkoholnim črnilom: Prelivanje barv; Fluorescenten; Bleščice; Sijajni učinek; Iridiscenten; Mat učinek; Kovinski; Neon; Neprozoren; Pastelen; Biserni učinek; Lesketajoč; Prosojen; Prozoren; Drugo
nl: Afwerkingseffect alcoholinkt: Color-shift; Fluorescerend; Glitter; Glanzend effect; Iriserend; Mat effect; Metallic; Neon; Dekkend; Pastel; Pareleffect; Glinsterend; Doorschijnend; Transparant; Overig
ru: Эффект отделки спиртовыми чернилами: Изменение цвета; Флуоресцентный; Глиттер; Глянцевый эффект; Радужный; Матовый эффект; Металлик; Неон; Непрозрачный; Пастель; Перламутровый; Шиммер; Полупрозрачный; Прозрачный; Другое
sk-SK: Efekt povrchovej úpravy alkoholovým atramentom: Meniace farbu; Fluorescenčné; Trblietavé; Lesklý efekt; Iridescentné; Matný efekt; Metalické; Neónové; Nepriehľadné; Pastelové; Perleťové; Jemne trblietavé; Priesvitné; Priehľadné; Iný
sv: Alkoholbläckeffekt: Färgskiftande; Fluorescerande; Glitter; Glansig effekt; Iriserande; Matt effekt; Metallic; Neon; Ogenomskinlig; Pastell; Pärlemorskimrande; Skimmer; Halvgenomskinlig; Transparent; Annan
nb: Alkoholblekk-finisheffekt: Fargeskift; Fluorescerende; Glitter; Glanset effekt; Iriserende; Matt effekt; Metallisk; Neon; Ugjennomsiktig; Pastell; Perlemorskimmer; Skimmer; Gjennomskinnelig; Gjennomsiktig; Annet
ja: アルコールインク仕上げ効果: カラーシフト; 蛍光; グリッター; グロス効果; 玉虫色; マット効果; メタリック; ネオン; 不透明; パステル; パール; シマー; 半透明; 透明; その他
lt-LT: Alkoholinio rašalo apdailos efektas: Kintančios spalvos; Fluorescencinis; Su blizgučiais; Blizgus efektas; Vaivorykštinis; Matinis efektas; Metalizuotas; Neoninis; Nepermatomas; Pastelinis; Perlamutrinis; Žėrintis; Pusiau skaidrus; Skaidrus; Kita
tr: Alkol bazlı mürekkep bitiş/efekt türü: Renk değiştiren; Floresan; Simli; Parlak efekt; Yanardöner; Mat efekt; Metalik; Neon; Opak; Pastel; Sedefli; Işıltılı; Yarı saydam; Şeffaf; Diğer
hu: Alkoholos tintával készült felület: Színváltó; Fluoreszkáló; Csillámos; Fényes hatású; Színjátszó; Matt hatású; Fémes; Neon; Átlátszatlan; Pasztell; Gyöngyházfényű; Csillogó; Áttetsző; Átlátszó; Egyéb
it: uomo con finitura a inchiostro alcolico: Cangiante; Fluorescente; Glitter; Effetto lucido; Iridescente; Effetto opaco; Metallico; Neon; Coprente; Pastello; Perlescente; Brillante; Traslucido; Trasparente; Altro
da: Alkoholblæk-finisheffekt: Farveskift; Fluorescerende; Glimmer; Blank effekt; Iriserende; Mat effekt; Metallisk; Neon; Uigennemsigtig; Pastel; Perlemor; Skimrende; Gennemskinnelig; Gennemsigtig; Andet
en: Alcohol ink finish effect: Color-shift; Fluorescent; Glitter; Glossy effect; Iridescent; Matte effect; Metallic; Neon; Opaque; Pastel; Pearlescent; Shimmer; Translucent; Transparent; Other
zh-CN: 酒精墨水表面效果: 变色; 荧光; 闪粉; 光泽效果; 虹彩; 哑光效果; 金属质感; 霓虹; 不透明; 柔和色调; 珠光; 微光; 半透明; 透明; 其他
vi: Hiệu ứng hoàn thiện mực cồn: Chuyển màu; Huỳnh quang; Kim tuyến; Hiệu ứng bóng; Ngũ sắc; Hiệu ứng mờ; Ánh kim; Neon; Đục; Pastel; Ánh ngọc trai; Lấp lánh; Trong mờ; Trong suốt; Khác
zh-TW: 酒精墨水表面效果: 變色; 螢光; 亮片; 亮面效果; 虹彩; 霧面效果; 金屬感; 霓虹; 不透明; 粉彩; 珠光; 微光; 半透明; 透明; 其他
bg-BG: Ефект на завършек при алкохолно мастило: Променящ се цвят; Флуоресцентен; Брокат; Гланцов ефект; Иридисцентен; Матов ефект; Металик; Неон; Непрозрачен; Пастел; Перлен; Блестящ; Полупрозрачен; Прозрачен; Друго
fi: Alkoholimusteen pintatehoste: Väriä vaihtava; Fluoresoiva; Kimalle; Kiiltävä efekti; Irisoiva; Mattaefekti; Metallinen; Neon; Peittävä; Pastelli; Helmiäinen; Hohto; Läpikuultava; Läpinäkyvä; Muu
ro-RO: Efect de finisaj cu cerneală pe bază de alcool: Schimbare de culoare; Fluorescent; Sclipici; Efect lucios; Iridescent; Efect mat; Metalizat; Neon; Opac; Pastel; Perlat; Reflexii; Translucid; Transparent; Altele
th: เอฟเฟกต์พื้นผิวจากหมึกแอลกอฮอล์: สีเหลือบ; สะท้อนแสง; กลิตเตอร์; เอฟเฟกต์แบบมันวาว; สีรุ้ง; เอฟเฟกต์แบบด้าน; เมทัลลิก; นีออน; ทึบแสง; พาสเทล; ประกายมุก; ชิมเมอร์; โปร่งแสง; โปร่งใส; อื่นๆ
cs: Efekt alkoholového inkoustu: Měnící barvu; Fluorescenční; Třpytivý; Lesklý efekt; Iridiscentní; Matný efekt; Metalický; Neonový; Neprůhledný; Pastelový; Perleťový; Jemně třpytivý; Průsvitný; Průhledný; Jiný
hr-HR: Efekt završne obrade alkoholnom tintom: Promjena boje; Fluorescentno; Sa šljokicama; Sjajni efekt; Preljevajuće; Mat efekt; Metalik; Neonsko; Neprozirno; Pastelno; Biserno; Svjetlucavo; Poluprozirno; Prozirno; Ostalo
fr: Effet de finition de l’encre à alcool: Couleur changeante; Fluorescent; Pailleté; Effet brillant; Irisé; Effet mat; Métallique; Néon; Opaque; Pastel; Nacré; Chatoyant; Translucide; Transparent; Autre
ko: 알코올 잉크 마감 효과: 컬러 시프트; 형광; 글리터; 유광 효과; 무지갯빛; 무광 효과; 메탈릭; 네온; 불투명; 파스텔; 펄; 쉬머; 반투명; 투명; 기타
el: Εφέ φινιρίσματος με μελάνι αλκοόλης: Μεταβαλλόμενο χρώμα; Φθορίζον; Γκλίτερ; Γυαλιστερό εφέ; Ιριδίζον; Ματ εφέ; Μεταλλικό; Νέον; Αδιαφανές; Παστέλ; Περλέ; Λαμπερό; Ημιδιαφανές; Διαφανές; Άλλο
es: Efecto de acabado de tinta de alcohol: Cambio de color; Fluorescente; Purpurina; Efecto brillante; Iridiscente; Efecto mate; Metálico; Neón; Opaco; Pastel; Nacarado; Brillo; Translúcido; Transparente; Otro
pt-BR: Efeito de acabamento com tinta à base de álcool: Mudança de cor; Fluorescente; Glitter; Efeito brilhante; Iridescente; Efeito fosco; Metálico; Neon; Opaco; Pastel; Perolado; Cintilante; Translúcido; Transparente; Outro
de: Finish/Effekt durch Alkoholtinte: Farbwechsel; Fluoreszierend; Glitzer; Glänzend; Irisierend; Matteffekt; Metallic; Neon; Blickdicht; Pastell; Perlglanz; Schimmernd; Transluzent; Transparent; Sonstige